Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.220

Effect on existing custodianships.

(1) Any transfer of custodial property as now defined in this chapter made before July 1, 1991, is validated notwithstanding that there was no specific authority in the Washington uniform gifts to minors act for the coverage of custodial property of that kind or for a transfer from that source at the time the transfer was made.

(2) This chapter applies to all transfers made before July 1, 1991, in a manner and form prescribed in the Washington uniform gifts to minors act, except insofar as the application impairs constitutionally vested rights or extends the duration of custodianships in existence on July 1, 1991. However, as to any custodianship established after August 9, 1971, but prior to January 1, 1985, a minor has the right after attaining the age of eighteen to demand delivery from the custodian of all or any portion of the custodial property.

[ 1991 c 193 s 22.]